test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-3lex_eemeed_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - eemeed:
    eemeed+N+Sg+Nom: eemeed
    eemeed+N+Sg+Gen: eemeed
    eemeed+N+Sg+Acc: eemeed
    eemeed+N+Sg+Ill: emedân
    eemeed+N+Sg+Loc: emedist
    eemeed+N+Sg+Com: emedáin
    eemeed+N+Sg+Abe: eemeedttáá
    eemeed+N+Ess: emedin
    eemeed+N+Par: emedid
    eemeed+N+Pl+Nom: emedeh
    eemeed+N+Pl+Gen: emedij
    eemeed+N+Pl+Acc: emedijd
    eemeed+N+Pl+Ill: emedáid
    eemeed+N+Pl+Loc: emedijn
    eemeed+N+Pl+Com: emedijguin
    eemeed+N+Pl+Abe: emedijttáá

  Noun - iiđeed:
    iiđeed+N+Sg+Nom: iiđeed
    iiđeed+N+Sg+Gen: iiđeed
    iiđeed+N+Sg+Acc: iiđeed
    iiđeed+N+Sg+Ill: iđedân
    iiđeed+N+Sg+Loc: iđedist
    iiđeed+N+Sg+Com: iđedáin
    iiđeed+N+Sg+Abe: iiđeedttáá
    iiđeed+N+Ess: iđedin
    iiđeed+N+Par: iđedid
    iiđeed+N+Pl+Nom: iđedeh
    iiđeed+N+Pl+Gen: iđedij
    iiđeed+N+Pl+Acc: iđedijd
    iiđeed+N+Pl+Ill: iđedáid
    iiđeed+N+Pl+Loc: iđedijn
    iiđeed+N+Pl+Com: iđedijguin
    iiđeed+N+Pl+Abe: iđedijttáá

  Noun - raameeg:
    raameeg+N+Sg+Nom: raameeg
    raameeg+N+Sg+Gen: raameeg
    raameeg+N+Sg+Acc: raameeg
    raameeg+N+Sg+Ill: ramegân
    raameeg+N+Sg+Loc: ramegist
    raameeg+N+Sg+Com: ramegáin
    raameeg+N+Sg+Abe: raameegttáá
    raameeg+N+Ess: ramegin
    raameeg+N+Par: ramegid
    raameeg+N+Pl+Nom: ramegeh
    raameeg+N+Pl+Gen: ramegij
    raameeg+N+Pl+Acc: ramegijd
    raameeg+N+Pl+Ill: ramegáid
    raameeg+N+Pl+Loc: ramegijn
    raameeg+N+Pl+Com: ramegijguin
    raameeg+N+Pl+Abe: ramegijttáá

  Noun - puureeh:
    puureeh+N+Sg+Nom: puureeh
    puureeh+N+Sg+Gen: puureeh
    puureeh+N+Sg+Acc: puureeh
    puureeh+N+Sg+Ill: purehân
    puureeh+N+Sg+Loc: purehist
    puureeh+N+Sg+Com: pureháin
    puureeh+N+Sg+Abe: puureehttáá
    puureeh+N+Ess: purehin
    puureeh+N+Par: purehid
    puureeh+N+Pl+Nom: pureheh
    puureeh+N+Pl+Gen: purehij
    puureeh+N+Pl+Acc: purehijd
    puureeh+N+Pl+Ill: pureháid
    puureeh+N+Pl+Loc: purehijn
    puureeh+N+Pl+Com: purehijguin
    puureeh+N+Pl+Abe: purehijttáá

  Noun - kiiruurg:
    kiiruurg+N+Sg+Nom: kiiruurg
    kiiruurg+N+Sg+Gen: kiiruurg
    kiiruurg+N+Sg+Acc: kiiruurg
    kiiruurg+N+Sg+Ill: kirurgân
    kiiruurg+N+Sg+Loc: kirurgist
    kiiruurg+N+Sg+Com: kirurgáin
    kiiruurg+N+Sg+Abe: kiiruurgttáá
    kiiruurg+N+Ess: kirurgin
    kiiruurg+N+Par: kirurgid
    kiiruurg+N+Pl+Nom: kirurgeh
    kiiruurg+N+Pl+Gen: kirurgij
    kiiruurg+N+Pl+Acc: kirurgijd
    kiiruurg+N+Pl+Ill: kirurgáid
    kiiruurg+N+Pl+Loc: kirurgijn
    kiiruurg+N+Pl+Com: kirurgijguin
    kiiruurg+N+Pl+Abe: kirurgijttáá

  Noun - vookaal:
    vookaal+N+Sg+Nom: vookaal
    vookaal+N+Sg+Gen: vookaal
    vookaal+N+Sg+Acc: vookaal
    vookaal+N+Sg+Ill: vokalân
    vookaal+N+Sg+Loc: vokalist
    vookaal+N+Sg+Com: vokaláin
    vookaal+N+Sg+Abe: vookaalttáá
    vookaal+N+Ess: vokalin
    vookaal+N+Par: vokalid
    vookaal+N+Pl+Nom: vokaleh
    vookaal+N+Pl+Gen: vokalij
    vookaal+N+Pl+Acc: vokalijd
    vookaal+N+Pl+Ill: vokaláid
    vookaal+N+Pl+Loc: vokalijn
    vookaal+N+Pl+Com: vokalijguin
    vookaal+N+Pl+Abe: vokalijttáá

  Noun - kaanaal:
    kaanaal+N+Sg+Nom: kaanaal
    kaanaal+N+Sg+Gen: kaanaal
    kaanaal+N+Sg+Acc: kaanaal
    kaanaal+N+Sg+Ill: kanalân
    kaanaal+N+Sg+Loc: kanalist
    kaanaal+N+Sg+Com: kanaláin
    kaanaal+N+Sg+Abe: kaanaalttáá
    kaanaal+N+Ess: kanalin
    kaanaal+N+Par: kanalid
    kaanaal+N+Pl+Nom: kanaleh
    kaanaal+N+Pl+Gen: kanalij
    kaanaal+N+Pl+Acc: kanalijd
    kaanaal+N+Pl+Ill: kanaláid
    kaanaal+N+Pl+Loc: kanalijn
    kaanaal+N+Pl+Com: kanalijguin
    kaanaal+N+Pl+Abe: kanalijttáá

  Noun - juuriist:
    juuriist+N+Sg+Nom: juuriist
    juuriist+N+Sg+Gen: juuriist
    juuriist+N+Sg+Acc: juuriist
    juuriist+N+Sg+Ill: juristân
    juuriist+N+Sg+Loc: juristist
    juuriist+N+Sg+Com: juristáin
    juuriist+N+Sg+Abe: juuriisttáá
    juuriist+N+Ess: juristin
    juuriist+N+Par: juristid
    juuriist+N+Pl+Nom: juristeh
    juuriist+N+Pl+Gen: juristij
    juuriist+N+Pl+Acc: juristijd
    juuriist+N+Pl+Ill: juristáid
    juuriist+N+Pl+Loc: juristijn
    juuriist+N+Pl+Com: juristijguin
    juuriist+N+Pl+Abe: juristijttáá

  Noun - kyeppir: # 1B
    kyeppir+N+Sg+Nom: kyeppir
    kyeppir+N+Sg+Gen: kyeppir
    kyeppir+N+Sg+Acc: kyeppir
    kyeppir+N+Sg+Ill: kyeˊpirân
    kyeppir+N+Sg+Loc: kyeˊpirist
    kyeppir+N+Sg+Com: kyeˊpiráin
    kyeppir+N+Sg+Abe: kyeppirttáá
    kyeppir+N+Ess: kyeˊpirin
    kyeppir+N+Par: kyeˊpirid
    kyeppir+N+Pl+Nom: kyeˊpireh
    kyeppir+N+Pl+Gen: kyeˊpirij
    kyeppir+N+Pl+Acc: kyeˊpirijd
    kyeppir+N+Pl+Ill: kyeˊpiráid
    kyeppir+N+Pl+Loc: kyeˊpirijn
    kyeppir+N+Pl+Com: kyeˊpirijguin
    kyeppir+N+Pl+Abe: kyeˊpirijttáá

  Noun - čuoivâg: # 1B
    čuoivâg+N+Sg+Nom: čuoivâg
    čuoivâg+N+Sg+Gen: čuoivâg
    čuoivâg+N+Sg+Acc: čuoivâg
    čuoivâg+N+Sg+Ill: čuoˊivâgân
    čuoivâg+N+Sg+Loc: čuoˊivâgist
    čuoivâg+N+Sg+Com: čuoˊivâgáin
    čuoivâg+N+Sg+Abe: čuoivâgttáá
    čuoivâg+N+Ess: čuoˊivâgin
    čuoivâg+N+Par: čuoˊivâgid
    čuoivâg+N+Pl+Nom: čuoˊivâgeh
    čuoivâg+N+Pl+Gen: čuoˊivâgij
    čuoivâg+N+Pl+Acc: čuoˊivâgijd
    čuoivâg+N+Pl+Ill: čuoˊivâgáid
    čuoivâg+N+Pl+Loc: čuoˊivâgijn
    čuoivâg+N+Pl+Com: čuoˊivâgijguin
    čuoivâg+N+Pl+Abe: čuoˊivâgijttáá

  Noun - jiereeh:
    jiereeh+N+Sg+Nom: jiereeh
    jiereeh+N+Sg+Gen: jiereeh
    jiereeh+N+Sg+Acc: jiereeh
    jiereeh+N+Sg+Ill: jieˊrehân
    jiereeh+N+Sg+Loc: jieˊrehist
    jiereeh+N+Sg+Com: jieˊreháin
    jiereeh+N+Sg+Abe: jiereehttáá
    jiereeh+N+Ess: jieˊrehin
    jiereeh+N+Par: jieˊrehid
    jiereeh+N+Pl+Nom: jieˊreheh
    jiereeh+N+Pl+Gen: jieˊrehij
    jiereeh+N+Pl+Acc: jieˊrehijd
    jiereeh+N+Pl+Ill: jieˊreháid
    jiereeh+N+Pl+Loc: jieˊrehijn
    jiereeh+N+Pl+Com: jieˊrehijguin
    jiereeh+N+Pl+Abe: jieˊrehijttáá
 
  Noun - piäggálm: # 1B
    piäggálm+N+Sg+Nom: piäggálm
    piäggálm+N+Sg+Gen: piäggálm
    piäggálm+N+Sg+Acc: piäggálm
    piäggálm+N+Sg+Ill: piäˊgálmân
    piäggálm+N+Sg+Loc: piäˊgálmist
    piäggálm+N+Sg+Com: piäˊgálmáin
    piäggálm+N+Sg+Abe: piäˊgálmttáá
    piäggálm+N+Ess:    piäˊgálmin
    piäggálm+N+Par:    piäˊgálmid
    piäggálm+N+Pl+Nom: piäˊgálmeh
    piäggálm+N+Pl+Gen: piäˊgálmij
    piäggálm+N+Pl+Acc: piäˊgálmijd
    piäggálm+N+Pl+Ill: piäˊgálmáid
    piäggálm+N+Pl+Loc: piäˊgálmijn
    piäggálm+N+Pl+Com: piäˊgálmijguin
    piäggálm+N+Pl+Abe: piäˊgálmijttáá

  Noun - čuáđáád: # is this really a noun?
    čuáđáád+N+Sg+Nom: čuáđáád
    čuáđáád+N+Sg+Gen: čuáđáád
    čuáđáád+N+Sg+Acc: čuáđáád
    čuáđáád+N+Sg+Ill: čuáˊđádân
    čuáđáád+N+Sg+Loc: čuáˊđádist
    čuáđáád+N+Sg+Com: čuáˊđádáin
    čuáđáád+N+Sg+Abe: čuáđáádttáá
    čuáđáád+N+Ess: čuáˊđádin
    čuáđáád+N+Par: čuáˊđádid
    čuáđáád+N+Pl+Nom: čuáˊđádeh
    čuáđáád+N+Pl+Gen: čuáˊđádij
    čuáđáád+N+Pl+Acc: čuáˊđádijd
    čuáđáád+N+Pl+Ill: čuáˊđádáid
    čuáđáád+N+Pl+Loc: čuáˊđádijn
    čuáđáád+N+Pl+Com: čuáˊđádijguin
    čuáđáád+N+Pl+Abe: čuáˊđádijttáá

  Noun - iäláán: # 1B
    iäláán+N+Sg+Nom: iäláán
    iäláán+N+Sg+Gen: iäláán
    iäláán+N+Sg+Acc: iäláán
    iäláán+N+Sg+Ill: iäˊlánân
    iäláán+N+Sg+Loc: iäˊlánist
    iäláán+N+Sg+Com: iäˊlánáin
    iäláán+N+Sg+Abe: iäˊláánttáá
    iäláán+N+Ess:    iäˊlánin
    iäláán+N+Par:    iäˊlánid
    iäláán+N+Pl+Nom: iäˊláneh
    iäláán+N+Pl+Gen: iäˊlánij
    iäláán+N+Pl+Acc: iäˊlánijd
    iäláán+N+Pl+Ill: iäˊlánáid
    iäláán+N+Pl+Loc: iäˊlánijn
    iäláán+N+Pl+Com: iäˊlánijguin
    iäláán+N+Pl+Abe: iäˊlánijttáá

  Noun - saalaat: # ok Matti Morottaja sujâttem mield; nubbe vyehi POTTAAK
    saalaat+N+Sg+Nom: saalaat
    saalaat+N+Sg+Gen: saalaat
    saalaat+N+Sg+Acc: saalaat
    saalaat+N+Sg+Ill: salatân
    saalaat+N+Sg+Loc: salatist
    saalaat+N+Sg+Com: salatáin
    saalaat+N+Sg+Abe: saalaattáá
    saalaat+N+Ess: salatin
    saalaat+N+Par: salatid
    saalaat+N+Pl+Nom: salateh
    saalaat+N+Pl+Gen: salatij
    saalaat+N+Pl+Acc: salatijd
    saalaat+N+Pl+Ill: salatáid
    saalaat+N+Pl+Loc: salatijn
    saalaat+N+Pl+Com: salatijguin
    saalaat+N+Pl+Abe: salatijttáá

  Noun - toomaat: # ok Matti Morottaja sujâttem mield; nubbe vyehi POTTAAK
    toomaat+v1+N+Sg+Nom: toomaat
    toomaat+v1+N+Sg+Gen: toomaat
    toomaat+v1+N+Sg+Acc: toomaat
    toomaat+v1+N+Sg+Ill: tomatân
    toomaat+v1+N+Sg+Loc: tomatist
    toomaat+v1+N+Sg+Com: tomatáin
    toomaat+v1+N+Sg+Abe: toomaattáá
    toomaat+v1+N+Ess: tomatin
    toomaat+v1+N+Par: tomatid
    toomaat+v1+N+Pl+Nom: tomateh
    toomaat+v1+N+Pl+Gen: tomatij
    toomaat+v1+N+Pl+Acc: tomatijd
    toomaat+v1+N+Pl+Ill: tomatáid
    toomaat+v1+N+Pl+Loc: tomatijn
    toomaat+v1+N+Pl+Com: tomatijguin
    toomaat+v1+N+Pl+Abe: tomatijttáá
    
  Noun - rooboot: # ok Matti Morottaja sujâttem mield; nubbe vyehi LITTER
    rooboot+v2+N+Sg+Nom: rooboot
    rooboot+v2+N+Sg+Gen: rooboot
    rooboot+v2+N+Sg+Acc: rooboot
    rooboot+v2+N+Sg+Ill: robotân
    rooboot+v2+N+Sg+Loc: robotist
    rooboot+v2+N+Sg+Com: robotáin
    rooboot+v2+N+Sg+Abe: rooboottáá
    rooboot+v2+N+Ess: robotin
    rooboot+v2+N+Par: robotid
    rooboot+v2+N+Pl+Nom: roboteh
    rooboot+v2+N+Pl+Gen: robotij
    rooboot+v2+N+Pl+Acc: robotijd
    rooboot+v2+N+Pl+Ill: robotáid
    rooboot+v2+N+Pl+Loc: robotijn
    rooboot+v2+N+Pl+Com: robotijguin
    rooboot+v2+N+Pl+Abe: robotijttáá
    
  Noun - ruávást: # 1B d-k,  v-ˊv
    ruávást+N+Sg+Nom: ruávást
    ruávást+N+Sg+Gen: ruávást
    ruávást+N+Sg+Acc: ruávást
    ruávást+N+Sg+Ill: ruáˊvástân
    ruávást+N+Sg+Loc: ruáˊvástist
    ruávást+N+Sg+Com: ruáˊvástáin
    ruávást+N+Sg+Abe: ruávásttáá
    ruávást+N+Ess: ruáˊvástin
    ruávást+N+Par: ruáˊvástid
    ruávást+N+Pl+Nom: ruáˊvásteh
    ruávást+N+Pl+Gen: ruáˊvástij
    ruávást+N+Pl+Acc: ruáˊvástijd
    ruávást+N+Pl+Ill: ruáˊvástáid
    ruávást+N+Pl+Loc: ruáˊvástijn
    ruávást+N+Pl+Com: ruáˊvástijguin
    ruávást+N+Pl+Abe: ruáˊvástijttáá

  Noun - siilak: # 1B d-k,  v-ˊv
    siilak+N+Sg+Nom: siilak
    siilak+N+Sg+Gen: siilak
    siilak+N+Sg+Acc: siilak
    siilak+N+Sg+Ill: silakân
    siilak+N+Sg+Loc: silakist
    siilak+N+Sg+Com: silakáin
    siilak+N+Sg+Abe: siilakttáá
    siilak+N+Ess: silakin
    siilak+N+Par: silakid
    siilak+N+Pl+Nom: silakeh
    siilak+N+Pl+Gen: silakij
    siilak+N+Pl+Acc: silakijd
    siilak+N+Pl+Ill: silakáid
    siilak+N+Pl+Loc: silakijn
    siilak+N+Pl+Com: silakijguin
    siilak+N+Pl+Abe: silakijttáá

  Noun - iilâsk: # 1B d-k,  v-ˊv
    iilâsk+N+Sg+Nom: iilâsk
    iilâsk+N+Sg+Gen: iilâsk
    iilâsk+N+Sg+Acc: iilâsk
    iilâsk+N+Sg+Ill: ilâskân
    iilâsk+N+Sg+Loc: ilâskist
    iilâsk+N+Sg+Com: ilâskáin
    iilâsk+N+Sg+Abe: iilâskttáá
    iilâsk+N+Ess: ilâskin
    iilâsk+N+Par: ilâskid
    iilâsk+N+Pl+Nom: ilâskeh
    iilâsk+N+Pl+Gen: ilâskij
    iilâsk+N+Pl+Acc: ilâskijd
    iilâsk+N+Pl+Ill: ilâskáid
    iilâsk+N+Pl+Loc: ilâskijn
    iilâsk+N+Pl+Com: ilâskijguin
    iilâsk+N+Pl+Abe: ilâskijttáá
    
  Noun - kappeer: # ok
    kappeer+N+Sg+Nom: kappeer
    kappeer+N+Sg+Gen: kappeer
    kappeer+N+Sg+Acc: kappeer 
    kappeer+N+Sg+Ill: kaperân
    kappeer+N+Sg+Loc: kaperist 
    kappeer+N+Sg+Com: kaperáin
    kappeer+N+Ess: kaperin 
    kappeer+N+Par: kaperid
    kappeer+N+Pl+Nom: kapereh
    kappeer+N+Pl+Gen: kaperij
    kappeer+N+Pl+Acc: kaperijd
    kappeer+N+Pl+Ill: kaperáid
    kappeer+N+Pl+Loc: kaperijn
    kappeer+N+Pl+Com: kaperijguin
    kappeer+N+Pl+Abe: kaperijttáá 

  Noun - immeel: # 1B g-v, CCVV > CV
    immeel+N+Sg+Nom: immeel
    immeel+N+Sg+Gen: immeel
    immeel+N+Sg+Acc: immeel
    immeel+N+Sg+Ill: iṃelân
    immeel+N+Sg+Loc: iṃelist
    immeel+N+Sg+Com: iṃeláin
    immeel+N+Sg+Abe: immeelttáá
    immeel+N+Ess: iṃelin
    immeel+N+Par: iṃelid
    immeel+N+Pl+Nom: iṃeleh
    immeel+N+Pl+Gen: iṃelij
    immeel+N+Pl+Acc: iṃelijd
    immeel+N+Pl+Ill: iṃeláid
    immeel+N+Pl+Loc: iṃelijn
    immeel+N+Pl+Com: iṃelijguin
    immeel+N+Pl+Abe: iṃelijttáá
